New York, session 2025-2026, S5301.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The county law is amended by adding a new section 663 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 663. Appointment of school resource officers at private elementary 4 and secondary schools. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to 5 the contrary, the sheriff of any county, any part or all of which falls 6 outside the limits of a city having a population of one million or more, 7 may appoint a deputy as a school resource officer, school safety offi- 8 cer, school security officer or any other substantially similar position 9 or office that is designed to provide safety and/or security on school 10 grounds, to a requesting private elementary or secondary school where 11 there are no available local police officers for appointment. The sher- 12 iff may appoint such school security officers pursuant to this section 13 only if more than fifty percent of the total acreage of real property 14 owned by or under the control of such private elementary or secondary 15 school is located within such sheriff's county of jurisdiction and 16 outside the geographic boundaries of any city within such county. The 17 sheriff may appoint such school security officers only if the county 18 legislature or board of supervisors, pursuant to local law or resolution 19 duly adopted, has authorized the sheriff to make such appointments. Any 20 such appointed school resource officers shall be employees of the 21 private elementary or secondary school requesting such appointment and 22 shall not be officers, agents, servants or employees of the appointing 23 sheriff or such sheriff's county of jurisdiction nor be considered 24 public officers, agents, servants or employees. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08835-01-5 S. 5301 2 1 2. The sheriff may condition appointment as private school resource 2 officers upon compliance by such school resource officers with written 3 procedures established by the sheriff in order to ensure a coordinated 4 and cooperative law enforcement effort and the payment of an administra- 5 tive fee not to exceed fifty dollars per year per school resource offi- 6 cer, and may revoke such appointments at any time for material non-com- 7 pliance with the requirements of such written procedures or for any 8 other reason that shall disqualify a school resource officer from being 9 such school resource officer pursuant to the provisions of this section. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 11 have become a law.